Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-985
Employees retirement system; legal advisor.

The board of trustees may contract for the services of a legal advisor to the board of trustees.

Laws 1951, c. 274, § 8, p. 915;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1039;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 620;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 65;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 24.
March 31, 2016